Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4003
Cancel, defined.

Cancel shall mean to discontinue for up to five years all rights and privileges under a license or certification.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 26.